Utah statutes.
58-55-311.   Evidence of licensure.

An individual licensed as an alarm company agent shall:

(1)  carry a copy of the individual's license on the individual's person at all times while acting as a licensee;

(2)  display the license upon the request of a peace officer, a representative of the division, or a representative of a customer of the alarm company.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 317, 2000 General Session

